Maryland, session 2025, HB0917.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
11–506.
(a) Except as provided in § 11–510.1 of this subtitle, a person filing an application
to register securities shall pay a fee of 0.1 percent of the maximum aggregate offering price
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0917*

HOUSE BILL 917
at which the securities are to be offered in this State, but the fee may not be less than $500
or more than $1,500.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a person
required to submit a filing in accordance with an exemption granted under this title shall
pay a fee of $400 for each filing.
(2) A person required to submit a filing in accordance with the exemption
granted under § 11–601(16) of this title shall pay a fee of [$100] $250 for each filing.
(3) A person required to submit a notice of the offer or sale of federal
covered securities under § 11–503.1(c) of this subtitle shall pay:
(i) A fee of [$100] $250 for [each] THE INITIAL filing; [and]
(ii) A FEE OF $300 FOR EACH AMENDED FILING; AND
(III) An additional fee of $150 for each filing made after the filing due
date.
(c) The Commissioner shall retain the fee, if:
(1) An application to register securities is withdrawn before the effective
date;
(2) A notice of the offer or sale of a federal covered security is withdrawn;
or
(3) A preeffective stop order is entered under §§ 11–511 through 11–513 of
this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.